District of Columbia statutes.
44-554

Rules.

The Mayor may issue rules to implement this subchapter, including procedures for additional enforcement actions for violation of this subchapter and the setting of fees in accordance with the provisions of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-238, § 5, 46 DCR 881
1981 Ed., § 32-1354.